District of Columbia statutes.
34-2154

Administering of grants.

WASA shall administer the grants under this chapter. A household requesting a grant for assistance in replacing a lead service line on private property shall apply to WASA for the grant, and WASA shall determine whether the household meets the eligibility criteria of § 34-2153(a). Upon determination by WASA that a household is eligible for a grant under this chapter, WASA or a subcontractor of WASA shall replace the service line on private property at cost and shall credit the household for the amount of the grant for which it is eligible against the costs of replacement.

History

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 6015, 51 DCR 8441

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6015 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6015 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).